California, session 20252026, AB2258.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) California’s economy depends on the ability of working families to access stable, affordable, and reliable childcare. Childcare is essential workforce infrastructure that enables parents to work, employers to operate, and businesses to grow.(2) Access to consistent childcare promotes healthy child development, supports school readiness, and contributes to long-term educational and economic outcomes for children.(3) Disruptions in childcare arrangements create instability for children and families, undermine workforce participation, and result in lost productivity for employers and the state’s economy.(4) California has made significant public investments in subsidized childcare and early learning programs; however, a portion of these funds remain unspent each year due to administrative barriers, timing misalignments, and structural inefficiencies across programs.(5) Alternative payment program contractors serve as the primary delivery system for voucher-based childcare and are uniquely positioned to rapidly enroll families, support parental choice, and deploy available funding efficiently.(6) Community-based organizations administering childcare programs play a critical role in connecting families to childcare and related supports, including food, housing, and health services, thereby strengthening family stability and economic self-sufficiency.(7) Maximizing the use of existing childcare funding, in addition to making new investments, is essential to serving more families without unnecessary delay or additional cost.(8) Unspent childcare funds represent missed opportunities to serve eligible families and maximizing the use of all currently appropriated funds is an essential first step toward achieving universal access to childcare in California.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:(1) Prioritize continuity of care for children and families, including maintaining care placements across eligibility periods and minimizing disruptions due to administrative processes.(2) Ensure that California’s childcare system operates as a coordinated, responsive infrastructure that meets families where they are and eliminates barriers to access.(3) Ensure that all appropriated childcare funds are fully utilized to serve eligible families and that systems are aligned to maximize enrollment, continuity of care, and timely access to services.SEC. 2. Section 10234.5 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:10234.5. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Social Services shall, in consultation with contractors, no less than quarterly, identify unspent or projected unexpended moneys from all subsidized childcare and development programs administered pursuant to this division, including, but not limited to:(1) General childcare and development programs.(2) Migrant childcare programs.(3) CalWORKs childcare programs, including Stages 1, 2, and 3.(4) Any other state- or federally funded subsidized childcare programs.(b) To the maximum extent permitted by federal and state law, the department shall shall, in consultation with contractors, redirect and deposit the unspent or unexpended moneys identified pursuant to subdivision (a) to the Alternative Payment Program Enrollment Fund, as hereby created in the State Treasury.(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the Alternative Payment Program Enrollment Fund are continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to the department for the purpose of enrolling additional eligible families in alternative payment programs.(d) The department shall expend moneys in the Alternative Payment Program Enrollment Fund in a manner that prioritizes all of the following:(1) Contractors with demonstrated capacity to enroll additional families.(2) Enrollment of families currently on waitlists or in the eligibility determination process.(3) Continuity of care for children, including maintaining placements for siblings and preventing disruptions in care.(e) The department shall establish a streamlined and timely process for the transfer or redirection of moneys, including improvements to or expansion of existing voluntary temporary transfer processes, to ensure that moneys are fully utilized within the applicable fiscal period.(f) Moneys redirected pursuant to this section shall not be subject to administrative delays that would prevent their timely obligation or expenditure.(g) The department shall notify each local childcare and development planning council established pursuant to Section 10485 whenever moneys are identified as unspent, or projected to remain unexpended, and are subject to transfer or redirection pursuant to this section. The notification shall identify the applicable subsidized childcare and development program and the amount of moneys subject to transfer or redirection.(g)(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to reduce or eliminate funding allocations for existing contracts. This section is intended solely to maximize the utilization of moneys that would otherwise remain unspent.(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, funds used to meet the minimum funding obligation imposed pursuant to Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution shall not be subject to identification, transfer, redirection, deposit, or expenditure pursuant to this section.